District of Columbia statutes.
21-145

Property subject to executory contract.

When an infant is:

(1)

entitled to real or personal estate in the District of Columbia bound by executory contract entered into by the person from whom the infant derived title; or

(2)

claims a right or interest in property under such a contract—

the court may decree the execution of the contract or enter a just and proper decree, as if the parties were of full age.

Sept. 14, 1965, 79 Stat. 742, Pub. L. 89-183, § 1

History

1981 Ed., § 21-145.
1973 Ed., § 21-145.

Prior Codifications